Utah statutes.
48-2c-610 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Management of a series.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement, the management of a series is vested in the members associated with the series in proportion to the then-current percentage or other interest of members in the profits of the series owned by all of the members associated with the series.

(2)  Unless otherwise provided in an operating agreement, the decision of members owning more than 50% of the then-current percentage or other interest in the profits controls.

(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2), if an operating agreement provides for the management of the series in whole or in part by a manager, the management of the series is vested to that extent in the manager, who is chosen in the manner provided in the operating agreement.

(4)  The manager of a series holds the offices and has the responsibilities accorded to the manager under the operating agreement.

(5)  A series may have more than one manager.

(6)  Subject to a manager's resignation, a manager ceases to be a manager with respect to a series as provided in the operating agreement.

(7)  Except as otherwise provided in an operating agreement, any event under this chapter or in an operating agreement that causes a manager to cease to be a manager with respect to a series does not, by itself, cause the manager to cease to be a manager of the limited liability company or with respect to any other series.

